Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-102
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 60-103 to 60-136.01 shall be used.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 8;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 8.